Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1824
Excluded incidents.

No order for payment of compensation under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act shall be made for injuries or death resulting from incidents or offenses occurring prior to January 1, 1979, or outside the state.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 24;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 25.